Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 7 Driver's Licenses

For legislative history of this chapter,

see Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Irvine, 589 P.2d 1295,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 358

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the Wyoming Financial Responsibility Act,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 84.

For article, “The License Problem,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 106.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 55 to 104.

Lack of proper automobile registration or operator's license as evidence of negligence, 29 ALR2d 963.

Liability of parent who gives automobile or motorcycle to minor child forbidden by statute to operate same for child's negligence, 36 ALR2d 735.

What amounts to conviction or adjudication of guilt for purposes of refusal, revocation or suspension of automobile driver's license, 79 ALR2d 866.

Youth of operator of automobile as affecting his negligence, 92 ALR2d 872.

Denial, suspension or cancellation of driver's license because of physical disease or defect, 38 ALR3d 452.

State's liability for improperly licensing negligent driver, 79 ALR3d 955.

Validity and application of statute or regulation authorizing revocation or suspension of driver's license for reason unrelated to use of, or ability to operate, motor vehicle, 18 ALR5th 542.

Admissibility in motor vehicle license suspension proceedings, of evidence obtained by unlawful search and seizure, 23 ALR5th 108.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 272, 274.